Alaska, session 34, HB275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 37.05.540(b) is amended to read: 04 (b) Except for appropriations to the permanent fund or for Alaska permanent 05 fund dividends, appropriations to the budget reserve fund, appropriations of revenue 06 bond proceeds, appropriations required to pay the principal and interest on general 07 obligation bonds, and appropriations of money received from a nonstate source in trust 08 for a specific purpose, including revenue of a public enterprise or public corporation 09 of the state that issues revenue bonds, appropriations from the mental health trust 10 settlement income account (AS 37.14.036), and appropriations made to the mental 11 health trust fund (AS 37.14.031), appropriations from the treasury made in a fiscal 12 year may not exceed appropriations made in the preceding fiscal year by more than 13 one [FIVE] percent [PLUS THE CHANGE IN POPULATION AND INFLATION 14 SINCE THE BEGINNING OF THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR]. For purposes of 15 applying this limit an appropriation is considered to be made in the fiscal year in 01 which it is enacted and a reappropriation remains attributed to the fiscal year in which 02 the original appropriation is enacted. [THE DETERMINATION OF THE CHANGE 03 IN POPULATION FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE BASED 04 ON AN ANNUAL ESTIMATE OF POPULATION BY THE DEPARTMENT OF 05 LABOR AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT. THE DETERMINATION OF THE 06 CHANGE IN INFLATION FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE 07 BASED ON THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS 08 FOR ANCHORAGE PREPARED BY THE UNITED STATES BUREAU OF 09 LABOR STATISTICS.] The amount of money received by the state that is subject to 10 the appropriation limit includes the balance in the general fund carried forward from 11 the preceding fiscal year. 12 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect July 1, 2027. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.